Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4606
Municipal or county rules and regulations; authorized; conformance with state program; enforcement; failure to conform, effect.

Any municipality or county may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing erosion and sediment control within their respective jurisdictions. Any such municipal or county rules and regulations shall be in substantial conformance with the state erosion and sediment control program. If a municipality or county adopts and promulgates rules and regulations, it shall enforce such rules and regulations within the regulatory jurisdiction of such municipality or county. Whenever the rules and regulations of any municipality or county are deemed by the director not to be in substantial conformance with the state erosion and sediment control program, the municipality or county may either amend such rules and regulations to conform, adopt rules and regulations which are in conformance, or defer responsibility to adopt, administer, and enforce such rules and regulations to the appropriate district.

Laws 1986, LB 474, § 6.